Illinois, session 104th, SB577.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Government Severance Pay Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 415/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Government Severance Pay Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-895, eff. 1-1-19.)